Tennessee, session 114, SB2238.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. This act is known and may be cited as the "Hunting for Heroes Act."
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 70-2-104, is amended by adding the
following as a new subsection:
(i) For purposes of the Tennessee national guard sportsman license created in §
70-2-201:
(1) A member in good standing shall provide all information necessary to
the agency in order to obtain a Tennessee national guard sportsman license.
For purposes of this subsection (i), "member" has the same meaning as defined
in § 49-4-1003.
(2) Applications for a Tennessee national guard sportsman license must
contain information as the executive director, or designee, may require in order to
verify eligibility for issuance. At a minimum, eligibility requires:
(A) A valid United States military identification card; and
(B) Tennessee national guard membership information provided
to the agency by the adjutant general of the military department.
(3) Notwithstanding another law to the contrary, it is the legislative intent
that the costs of the Tennessee national guard sportsman license are borne by
the state from the state general fund and not from the wildlife resources fund.
SB2238
011251
- 1 -

SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 70-2-201, is amended by adding the
following as a new subsection:
( ) There is hereby created a Tennessee national guard sportsman license,
which entitles a member in good standing to qualify for a no-cost sportsman license in
the same manner as a resident annual sportsman license.
(1) The holder of a Tennessee national guard sportsman license shall
have the same benefits as a sportsman license as set forth in subsection (e).
(2) For purposes of this subsection, "member" has the same meaning as
defined in § 49-4-1003.
SECTION 4. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 011251